District of Columbia statutes.
34-215

“Service” defined.

The term “service” is used in this subtitle in its broadest and most inclusive sense.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 974, ch. 150, § 8, par. 1
1981 Ed., § 43-204.
1973 Ed., § 43-104.